New York, session 2025-2026, A7975.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The retirement and social security law is amended by adding 2 a new section 89-z to read as follows: 3 § 89-z. Retirement of certain employees employed by the New York power 4 authority. a. Any person who is employed by the New York power authority 5 and is a member of the labor organization certified or recognized to 6 represent the employees of such power authority shall be eligible to 7 retire pursuant to the provisions of this section. Such eligibility 8 shall be an alternative to the eligibility provisions available under 9 any other plan of this article to which such member is subject. 10 b. Such member shall be entitled to retire upon the completion of 11 twenty-five years of total creditable service by filing an application 12 therefor in the manner provided for in section seventy of this article. 13 c. Upon completion of twenty-five years of such service and upon 14 retirement, each such member shall receive a pension which, together 15 with an annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of such member's 16 accumulated contributions at the time of their retirement and an addi- 17 tional pension which is the actuarial equivalent of the reserved-for-in- 18 creased-take-home-pay to which such member may then be entitled shall be 19 sufficient to provide such member with a retirement allowance equal to 20 fifty percent of such member's final average salary. 21 d. Notwithstanding section forty-one of this article, as used in this 22 section "creditable service" shall include any and all services 23 performed as an employee of the New York power authority. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00633-06-5 A. 7975--A 2 1 e. A member, contributing on the basis of this section at the time of 2 retirement, shall retire after the completion of twenty-five years of 3 total creditable service. Application therefor may be filed in a manner 4 similar to that provided in section seventy of this article. Upon 5 completion of twenty-five years of such service and upon retirement, 6 each such member shall receive a pension which, together with an annuity 7 which shall be the actuarial equivalent of such member's accumulated 8 contributions at the time of their retirement and an additional pension 9 which is the actuarial equivalent of the reserve-for-increased-take- 10 home-pay to which such member may then be entitled shall be sufficient 11 to provide such member with a retirement allowance equal to fifty 12 percent of such member's final average salary. 13 f. In computing the twenty-five years of total service of a member 14 pursuant to this section full credit shall be given and full allowance 15 shall be made for service of such member in time of war after World War 16 I as defined in section two of this chapter, provided such member at the 17 time of such member's entrance into the armed forces was in state 18 service. 19 g. Nothing herein shall be construed to prevent a member, who does not 20 retire pursuant to the provisions of this section, from utilizing 21 service which is creditable service pursuant to the provisions of this 22 section for service credit pursuant to the provisions of any other plan 23 of this article to which such member is subject. 24 h. The provisions of this section shall be controlling notwithstanding 25 any other provision in this article to the contrary. 26 § 2. Subdivision a of section 445 of the retirement and social securi- 27 ty law, as amended by chapter 714 of the laws of 2023, is amended to 28 read as follows: 29 a. No member of a retirement system who is subject to the provisions 30 of this article shall retire without regard to age, exclusive of retire- 31 ment for disability, unless [he or she] such member is a police officer, 32 an investigator member of the New York city employees' retirement 33 system, firefighter, correction officer, a qualifying member as defined 34 in section eighty-nine-t, as added by chapter six hundred fifty-seven of 35 the laws of nineteen hundred ninety-eight, of this chapter, sanitation 36 worker, a special officer (including persons employed by the city of New 37 York in the title urban park ranger or associate urban park ranger), 38 school safety agent, campus peace officer or a taxi and limousine 39 commission inspector member of the New York city employees' retirement 40 system or the New York city board of education retirement system, a 41 dispatcher member of the New York city employees' retirement system, a 42 police communications member of the New York city employees' retirement 43 system, an EMT member of the New York city employees' retirement system, 44 a deputy sheriff member of the New York city employees' retirement 45 system, a correction officer of the Westchester county correction 46 department as defined in section eighty-nine-e of this chapter or 47 employed in Suffolk county as a peace officer, as defined in section 48 eighty-nine-s, as added by chapter five hundred eighty-eight of the laws 49 of nineteen hundred ninety-seven, of this chapter, employed in Suffolk 50 county as a correction officer, as defined in section eighty-nine-f of 51 this chapter, or employed in Nassau county as a correction officer, 52 uniformed correction division personnel, sheriff, undersheriff or deputy 53 sheriff, as defined in section eighty-nine-g of this chapter, or 54 employed in Nassau county as an ambulance medical technician, an ambu- 55 lance medical technician/supervisor or a member who performs ambulance 56 medical technician related services, or a police medic, police medic A. 7975--A 3 1 supervisor or a member who performs police medic related services, as 2 defined in section eighty-nine-s, as amended by chapter five hundred 3 seventy-eight of the laws of nineteen hundred ninety-eight, of this 4 chapter, or employed in Nassau county as a peace officer, as defined in 5 section eighty-nine-s, as added by chapter five hundred ninety-five of 6 the laws of nineteen hundred ninety-seven, of this chapter, or employed 7 in Albany county as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff, correction 8 officer or identification officer, as defined in section eighty-nine-h 9 of this chapter or is employed in St. Lawrence county as a sheriff, 10 undersheriff, deputy sheriff or correction officer, as defined in 11 section eighty-nine-i of this chapter or is employed in Orleans county 12 as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff or correction officer, as 13 defined in section eighty-nine-l of this chapter or is employed in 14 Jefferson county as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff or 15 correction officer, as defined in section eighty-nine-j of this chapter 16 or is employed in Onondaga county as a deputy sheriff-jail division 17 competitively appointed or as a correction officer, as defined in 18 section eighty-nine-k of this chapter or is employed in a county which 19 makes an election under subdivision j of section eighty-nine-p of this 20 chapter as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff or correction officer 21 as defined in such section eighty-nine-p or is employed in Broome County 22 as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff or correction officer, as 23 defined in section eighty-nine-m of this chapter or is a Monroe county 24 deputy sheriff-court security, or deputy sheriff-jailor as defined in 25 section eighty-nine-n, as added by chapter five hundred ninety-seven of 26 the laws of nineteen hundred ninety-one, of this chapter or is employed 27 in Greene county as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff or 28 correction officer, as defined in section eighty-nine-o of this chapter 29 or is a traffic officer with the town of Elmira as defined in section 30 eighty-nine-q of this chapter or is employed by Suffolk county as a park 31 police officer, as defined in section eighty-nine-r of this chapter or 32 is a peace officer employed by a county probation department as defined 33 in section eighty-nine-t, as added by chapter six hundred three of the 34 laws of nineteen hundred ninety-eight, of this chapter or is employed in 35 Rockland county as a deputy sheriff-civil as defined in section eighty- 36 nine-v of this chapter as added by chapter four hundred forty-one of the 37 laws of two thousand one, or is employed in Rockland county as a superi- 38 or correction officer as defined in section eighty-nine-v of this chap- 39 ter as added by chapter five hundred fifty-six of the laws of two thou- 40 sand one or is a paramedic employed by the police department in the town 41 of Tonawanda and retires under the provisions of section eighty-nine-v 42 of this chapter, as added by chapter four hundred seventy-two of the 43 laws of two thousand one, or is a county fire marshal, supervising fire 44 marshal, fire marshal, assistant fire marshal, assistant chief fire 45 marshal, chief fire marshal, division supervising fire marshal or fire 46 marshal trainee employed by the county of Nassau as defined in section 47 eighty-nine-w of this chapter or is employed in Monroe county as a depu- 48 ty sheriff-civil as defined in section eighty-nine-x of this chapter, 49 employed as an emergency medical technician, critical care technician, 50 advanced emergency medical technician, paramedic or supervisor of such 51 titles in a participating Suffolk county fire district as defined in 52 section eighty-nine-ss of this chapter, or is employed by the New York 53 power authority and is a member of the labor organization certified or 54 recognized to represent the employees of such power authority as defined 55 in section eighty-nine-z of this chapter and is in a plan which permits 56 immediate retirement upon completion of a specified period of service A. 7975--A 4 1 without regard to age. Except as provided in subdivision c of section 2 four hundred forty-five-a of this article, subdivision c of section four 3 hundred forty-five-b of this article, subdivision c of section four 4 hundred forty-five-c of this article, subdivision c of section four 5 hundred forty-five-d of this article, subdivision c of section four 6 hundred forty-five-e of this article, subdivision c of section four 7 hundred forty-five-f of this article and subdivision c of section four 8 hundred forty-five-h of this article, a member in such a plan and such 9 an occupation, other than a police officer or investigator member of the 10 New York city employees' retirement system or a firefighter, shall not 11 be permitted to retire prior to the completion of twenty-five years of 12 credited service; provided, however, if such a member in such an occupa- 13 tion is in a plan which permits retirement upon completion of twenty 14 years of service regardless of age, [he or she] such member may retire 15 upon completion of twenty years of credited service and prior to the 16 completion of twenty-five years of service, but in such event the bene- 17 fit provided from funds other than those based on such a member's own 18 contributions shall not exceed two per centum of final average salary 19 per each year of credited service. 20 § 3. Subdivision a of section 445 of the retirement and social securi- 21 ty law, as amended by section 2 of part TT of chapter 55 of the laws of 22 2025, is amended to read as follows: 23 a. No member of a retirement system who is subject to the provisions 24 of this article shall retire without regard to age, exclusive of retire- 25 ment for disability, unless they are a police officer, an investigator 26 member of the New York city employees' retirement system, firefighter, 27 correction officer, a qualifying member as defined in section eighty- 28 nine-t, as added by chapter six hundred fifty-seven of the laws of nine- 29 teen hundred ninety-eight, of this chapter, sanitation worker, a special 30 officer (including persons employed by the city of New York in the title 31 urban park ranger or associate urban park ranger), school safety agent, 32 campus peace officer or a taxi and limousine commission inspector member 33 of the New York city employees' retirement system or the New York city 34 board of education retirement system, a dispatcher member of the New 35 York city employees' retirement system, a police communications member 36 of the New York city employees' retirement system, an EMT member of the 37 New York city employees' retirement system, a deputy sheriff member of 38 the New York city employees' retirement system, a correction officer of 39 the Westchester county correction department as defined in section 40 eighty-nine-e of this chapter or employed in Suffolk county as a peace 41 officer, as defined in section eighty-nine-s, as added by chapter five 42 hundred eighty-eight of the laws of nineteen hundred ninety-seven, of 43 this chapter, employed in Suffolk county as a correction officer, as 44 defined in section eighty-nine-f of this chapter, or employed in Nassau 45 county as a correction officer, uniformed correction division personnel, 46 sheriff, undersheriff or deputy sheriff, as defined in section eighty- 47 nine-g of this chapter, or employed in Nassau county as an ambulance 48 medical technician, an ambulance medical technician/supervisor or a 49 member who performs ambulance medical technician related services, or a 50 police medic, police medic supervisor or a member who performs police 51 medic related services, as defined in section eighty-nine-s, as amended 52 by chapter five hundred seventy-eight of the laws of nineteen hundred 53 ninety-eight, of this chapter, or employed in Nassau county as a peace 54 officer, as defined in section eighty-nine-s, as added by chapter five 55 hundred ninety-five of the laws of nineteen hundred ninety-seven, of 56 this chapter, or employed in Albany county as a sheriff, undersheriff, A. 7975--A 5 1 deputy sheriff, correction officer or identification officer, as defined 2 in section eighty-nine-h of this chapter or is employed in St. Lawrence 3 county as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff or correction officer, 4 as defined in section eighty-nine-i of this chapter or is employed in 5 Orleans county as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff or correction 6 officer, as defined in section eighty-nine-l of this chapter or is 7 employed in Jefferson county as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff 8 or correction officer, as defined in section eighty-nine-j of this chap- 9 ter or is employed in Onondaga county as a deputy sheriff-jail division 10 competitively appointed or as a correction officer, as defined in 11 section eighty-nine-k of this chapter or is employed in a county which 12 makes an election under subdivision j of section eighty-nine-p of this 13 chapter as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff or correction officer 14 as defined in such section eighty-nine-p or is employed in Broome County 15 as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff or correction officer, as 16 defined in section eighty-nine-m of this chapter or is a Monroe county 17 deputy sheriff-court security, or deputy sheriff-jailor as defined in 18 section eighty-nine-n, as added by chapter five hundred ninety-seven of 19 the laws of nineteen hundred ninety-one, of this chapter or is employed 20 in Greene county as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff or 21 correction officer, as defined in section eighty-nine-o of this chapter 22 or is a traffic officer with the town of Elmira as defined in section 23 eighty-nine-q of this chapter or is employed by Suffolk county as a park 24 police officer, as defined in section eighty-nine-r of this chapter or 25 is a peace officer employed by a county probation department as defined 26 in section eighty-nine-t, as added by chapter six hundred three of the 27 laws of nineteen hundred ninety-eight, of this chapter or is employed in 28 Rockland county as a deputy sheriff-civil as defined in section eighty- 29 nine-v of this chapter as added by chapter four hundred forty-one of the 30 laws of two thousand one, or is employed in Rockland county as a superi- 31 or correction officer as defined in section eighty-nine-v of this chap- 32 ter as added by chapter five hundred fifty-six of the laws of two thou- 33 sand one or is a paramedic employed by the police department in the town 34 of Tonawanda and retires under the provisions of section eighty-nine-v 35 of this chapter, as added by chapter four hundred seventy-two of the 36 laws of two thousand one, or is a county fire marshal, supervising fire 37 marshal, fire marshal, assistant fire marshal, assistant chief fire 38 marshal, chief fire marshal, division supervising fire marshal or fire 39 marshal trainee employed by the county of Nassau as defined in section 40 eighty-nine-w of this chapter or is employed in Monroe county as a depu- 41 ty sheriff-civil as defined in section eighty-nine-x of this chapter, 42 employed as an emergency medical technician, critical care technician, 43 advanced emergency medical technician, paramedic or supervisor of such 44 titles in a participating Suffolk county fire district as defined in 45 section eighty-nine-ss of this chapter, or is a firefighter apprentice, 46 airport firefighter I, airport firefighter II, airport firefighter III, 47 or training and safety officer employed by the division of military and 48 naval affairs as defined in section eighty-nine-y of this chapter, or is 49 employed by the New York power authority and is a member of the labor 50 organization certified or recognized to represent the employees of such 51 power authority as defined in section eighty-nine-z of this chapter, and 52 is in a plan which permits immediate retirement upon completion of a 53 specified period of service without regard to age. Except as provided in 54 subdivision c of section four hundred forty-five-a of this article, 55 subdivision c of section four hundred forty-five-b of this article, 56 subdivision c of section four hundred forty-five-c of this article, A. 7975--A 6 1 subdivision c of section four hundred forty-five-d of this article, 2 subdivision c of section four hundred forty-five-e of this article, 3 subdivision c of section four hundred forty-five-f of this article and 4 subdivision c of section four hundred forty-five-h of this article, a 5 member in such a plan and such an occupation, other than a police offi- 6 cer or investigator member of the New York city employees' retirement 7 system or a firefighter, shall not be permitted to retire prior to the 8 completion of twenty-five years of credited service; provided, however, 9 if such a member in such an occupation is in a plan which permits 10 retirement upon completion of twenty years of service regardless of age, 11 they may retire upon completion of twenty years of credited service and 12 prior to the completion of twenty-five years of service, but in such 13 event the benefit provided from funds other than those based on such a 14 member's own contributions shall not exceed two per centum of final 15 average salary per each year of credited service. 16 § 4. Section 603 of the retirement and social security law is amended 17 by adding a new subdivision x to read as follows: 18 x. The service retirement benefit specified in section six hundred 19 four of this article shall be payable to members with twenty-five or 20 more years of creditable service, without regard to age, who are 21 employed by the New York power authority and are a member of the labor 22 organization certified or recognized to represent the employees of such 23 power authority, as defined in section eighty-nine-y of this chapter if: 24 (i) such members have met the minimum service requirements upon retire- 25 ment, and (ii) in the case of a member subject to the provisions of 26 article fourteen of this chapter, such member files an election therefor 27 which provides that such member will be subject to the provisions of 28 this article and to none of the provisions of such article fourteen. 29 Such election, which shall be irrevocable, shall be in writing, duly 30 executed and shall be filed with the comptroller within one year of the 31 effective date of this subdivision or within one year of entering into 32 service as an employee of the New York power authority and becoming a 33 member of the labor organization certified or recognized to represent 34 the employees of such power authority. The term "creditable service" 35 shall have the meaning as so defined in section eighty-nine-z of this 36 chapter and subdivision c of section six hundred one of this article. 37 § 5. Subdivision a of section 503 of the retirement and social securi- 38 ty law, as amended by chapter 18 of the laws of 2012, is amended to read 39 as follows: 40 a. The normal service retirement benefit specified in section five 41 hundred four of this article shall be payable to general members, other 42 than elective members, who have met the minimum service requirements 43 upon retirement and attainment of age sixty-two, provided, however, a 44 general member who is a peace officer employed by the unified court 45 system or a member of a teachers' retirement system may retire without 46 reduction of [his or her] such member's retirement benefit upon attain- 47 ment of at least fifty-five years of age and completion of thirty or 48 more years of service. For members who become members of the New York 49 state and local employees' retirement system on or after April first, 50 two thousand twelve, the normal service retirement benefits specified in 51 section five hundred four of this article shall be payable to general 52 members, other than elective members, who have met the minimum service 53 requirements upon retirement and attainment of age sixty-three; provided 54 that, a member who is an employee of the New York power authority who is 55 a member of the labor organization certified or recognized to represent 56 the employees of such power authority may retire without reduction of A. 7975--A 7 1 such member's retirement benefit upon attainment of twenty-five or more 2 years of service if they have elected the special retirement plan found 3 in section eighty-nine-z of this chapter. 4 § 6. Section 604 of the retirement and social security law is amended 5 by adding a new subdivision x to read as follows: 6 x. The early service retirement for a member who is an employee of the 7 New York power authority and is a member of the labor organization 8 certified or recognized to represent the employees of such power author- 9 ity as defined in section eighty-nine-z of this chapter, shall be a 10 pension equal to one-fiftieth of final average salary times years of 11 service as an employee of the New York power authority who is a member 12 of the labor organization certified or recognized to represent the 13 employees of such power authority, but not exceeding one-half of such 14 member's final average salary. 15 § 7. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, none of the 16 provisions of this act shall be subject to the appropriation requirement 17 of section twenty-five of the retirement and social security law. 18 § 8. All past service costs associated with implementing the 19 provisions of this act shall be borne by the New York Power Authority. 20 § 9. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 21 the amendments to section three of this act shall take effect on the 22 same date and in the same manner as section 2 of part TT of chapter 55 23 of the laws of 2025 takes effect. FISCAL NOTE.--Pursuant to Legislative Law, Section 50: This bill would permit members of the New York State and Local Employ- ees' Retirement System employed by the New York power authority who are members of the labor organization certified or recognized to represent the employees of such power authority to retire upon completion of twen- ty-five years of creditable service with a benefit of one-half final average salary. Members covered under Article 14 would be permitted one year to make an irrevocable election to switch to the twenty-five-year plan. If this bill is enacted during the 2025 Legislative Session, we antic- ipate that there will be an increase of approximately $3.0 million in the annual contributions of the New York power authority for the fiscal year ending March 31, 2026. In future years this cost will vary but is expected to average 4.0% of salary annually. In addition to the annual contributions discussed above, there will be an immediate past service cost of approximately $15.3 million which will be borne by the New York power authority as a one-time payment. This estimate assumes that payment will be made on February 1, 2026. These estimated costs are based on 564 affected members employed by the New York power authority, with annual salary of approximately $58.8 million as of March 31, 2024. The affected members were identified using information provided by the office of Senator Joseph Griffo. Summary of relevant resources: Membership data as of March 31, 2024 was used in measuring the impact of the proposed change, the same data used in the April 1, 2024 actuari- al valuation. Distributions and other statistics can be found in the 2024 Report of the Actuary and the 2024 Annual Comprehensive Financial Report. The actuarial assumptions and methods used are described in the 2024 Annual Report to the Comptroller on Actuarial Assumptions, and the Codes, Rules and Regulations of the State of New York: Audit and Control. The Market Assets and GASB Disclosures are found in the March 31, 2024 New York State and Local Retirement System Financial Statements and Supplementary Information. A. 7975--A 8 This fiscal note does not constitute a legal opinion on the viability of the proposed change nor is it intended to serve as a substitute for the professional judgment of an attorney. This estimate, dated April 9, 2025, and intended for use only during the 2025 Legislative Session, is Fiscal Note No. 2025-50. As Chief Actu- ary of the New York State and Local Retirement System, I, Aaron Schottin Young, hereby certify that this analysis complies with applicable Actu- arial Standards of Practice as well as the Code of Professional Conduct and Qualification Standards for Actuaries Issuing Statements of Actuari- al Opinion of the American Academy of Actuaries, of which I am a member.